Maine, session 132, LD833.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §637, sub-§11, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 156, §3 and affected
by §4, is amended to read:
11. Exception. This section does not apply to an employee covered by a collective
bargaining agreement during the period between January 1, 2021 and the expiration of the
agreement. This section does not apply to an employer that provides employees with 80 or
more hours of paid leave during the calendar year.